Connecticut, session 2026, HB05354.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (4) of subsection (d) of section 17b-99 of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(4) A finding of overpayment or underpayment to a provider in a
program operated or administered by the department pursuant to this
chapter or chapter 319t, 319v, 319y or 319ff, except a provider for which
rates are established pursuant to section 17b-340, shall not be based on
extrapolation unless the total net amount of extrapolated overpayment
calculated from a statistically valid sampling and extrapolation
methodology exceeds [one] two and three-quarters per cent of total
claims paid to the provider for the audit period. Beginning with audit
review periods commencing January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall
make available up-to-date education materials and technical assistance
documents to assist providers with proper Medicaid billing prior to
extrapolation.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026